Missouri, session 2026, SB1035.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 290.590, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 290.589,
to read as follows:
290.589. 1. As used in this section, the term "labor
organization" means any organization of any kind or agency
or employee representation committee or union that exists
for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with
employers concerning wages, rates of pay, hours of work,
other conditions of employment, or other forms of
compensation.
2. No person shall be required as a condition or
continuation of employment to:
(1) Become or refrain from becoming a member of a
labor organization;
(2) Pay any dues, fees, assessments, or other similar
charges however denominated of any kind or amount to a labor
organization; or
(3) In lieu of the payments listed under subdivision
(2) of this subsection, pay to any charity or other third
party any amount equivalent to, or on a pro rata basis, any
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1035 2
dues, fees, assessments, or other charges required of
members of a labor organization.
3. Any agreement, understanding, or practice, written
or oral, implied or express, between any labor organization
and employer that violates the rights of employees as
guaranteed under this section is declared to be unlawful,
null and void, and of no legal effect.
4. Any person who directly or indirectly violates any
provision of this section shall be guilty of a class C
misdemeanor.
5. (1) Any person injured as a result of any
violation or threatened violation of this section shall be
entitled to injunctive relief against any and all violators
or persons threatening violations.
(2) Any person injured as a result of any violation or
threatened violation of this section may recover any and all
damages of any character resulting from such violation or
threatened violation including costs and reasonable attorney
fees. Such remedies shall be independent of and in addition
to the other penalties and remedies permitted under this
section.
6. It shall be the duty of the prosecuting attorney of
each county and of the attorney general of this state to
investigate complaints of violation or threatened violation
of this section and to prosecute any person violating this
section and to use all means at their command to ensure the
effective enforcement of this section.
7. This section shall not apply:
(1) To employers and employees covered by the federal
Railway Labor Act, as amended;
(2) To federal employers and employees;

SB 1035 3
(3) To employers and employees on exclusive federal
enclaves;
(4) Where this section conflicts with or is preempted
by federal law; or
(5) To any collective bargaining agreement or any
other type of agreement between an employer and a labor
organization entered into before the effective date of this
section but shall apply to any new agreement or renewal or
extension of any existing collective bargaining agreement.
8. (1) This section shall apply only in any county
that adopts the provisions of this section as provided in
this subsection.
(2) (a) The governing body of each county may, by
order or ordinance, adopt the provisions of this section.
No such order or ordinance adopted under this section shall
become effective unless the governing body of the county
submits to the voters residing within the county a proposal
to authorize the governing body to adopt the provisions of
this section. Such proposal shall be submitted to the
voters on the next date available to the county for public
elections under chapter 115 after the adoption of the order
or ordinance by the governing body. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the question, then the order or
ordinance shall become effective. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are opposed to the question, then the order or
ordinance shall not become effective unless and until the
question is resubmitted under this subdivision to the
qualified voters and such question is approved by a majority
of the qualified voters voting on the question.

SB 1035 4
(b) The question submitted by a governing body
pursuant to this subdivision shall be in substantially the
following form:
"Shall the County of .......... adopt the
provisions of Section 290.589, RSMo, prohibiting
any employer in the County of .......... from
requiring employees to become or refrain from
becoming a member of any labor organization as a
condition of employment?"
□ YES □ NO
(3) (a) The governing body of any county that has
adopted the provisions of this section may submit the
question of repeal of the adoption of the provisions of this
section to the voters on the next date available to the
county for public elections under chapter 115. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified
voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal, that
repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of
the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified
100 voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the
101 provisions of this section shall remain effective until the
102 question is resubmitted under this subdivision to the
103 qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of
104 the qualified voters voting on the question.
105 (b) The question submitted by a governing body
106 pursuant to this subdivision shall be in substantially the
107 following form:
108 "Shall the County of .......... repeal the ordinance
109 authorized by Section 290.589, RSMo, prohibiting any

SB 1035 5
110 employer in the County of .......... from requiring
111 employees to become or refrain from becoming a
112 member of any labor organization as a condition of
113 employment?"
114 □ YES □ NO
115 (4) (a) If the governing body of any county that has
116 adopted the provisions of this section receives a petition,
117 signed by a number of registered voters of the county equal
118 to at least ten percent of the number of registered voters
119 of the county voting in the last gubernatorial election,
120 calling for an election to repeal the adoption of the
121 provisions of this section, the governing body shall submit
122 to the voters a proposal to repeal the provisions of this
123 section on the next date available to the county for public
124 elections under chapter 115. If a majority of the votes
125 cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon
126 are in favor of the repeal, the repeal shall become
127 effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in
128 which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes
129 cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon
130 are opposed to the repeal, then the provisions of this
131 section shall remain effective until the question is
132 resubmitted under this subdivision to the qualified voters
133 and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified
134 voters voting on the question.
135 (b) The petition submitted pursuant to this
136 subdivision shall be in substantially the following form:
137 "Shall the County of .......... repeal the ordinance
138 authorized by Section 290.589, RSMo, prohibiting any
139 employer in the County of .......... from requiring
140 employees to become or refrain from becoming a

SB 1035 6
141 member of any labor organization as a condition of
142 employment?"
143 □ YES □ NO
[290.590. 1. As used in this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Employer", any individual,
organization, partnership, state agency,
political subdivision, corporation, or other
legal entity which employs or has employed one
or more individuals performing services for the
entity within this state; and
(2) "Labor organization", any organization
of any kind or agency, or employee
representation committee or union which exists
for the purpose in whole or in part of dealing
with employers concerning wages, rates of pay,
hours of work, other conditions of employment,
or other forms of compensation.
2. No person shall be required as a
condition or continuation of employment to:
(1) Become, remain, or refrain from
becoming a member of a labor organization;
(2) Pay any dues, fees, assessments, or
other similar charges however denominated of any
kind or amount to a labor organization; or
(3) In lieu of the payments listed under
subdivision (2) of this subsection, pay to any
charity or other third party any amount
equivalent to, or on a pro rata basis, any dues,
fees, assessments, or other charges required of
members of a labor organization.
3. Any agreement, understanding, or
practice, written or oral, implied or expressed,
between any labor organization and employer that
violates the rights of employees as guaranteed
under this section is unlawful, null and void,
and of no legal effect.
4. Any person who violates or directs
another to violate any provision of this section
shall be guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

SB 1035 7
5. (1) Any person injured as a result of
any violation or threatened violation of this
section shall be entitled to injunctive relief
against any and all violators or persons
threatening violations.
(2) Any person injured as a result of any
violation or threatened violation of this
section may recover any and all damages of any
character resulting from such violation or
threatened violation including costs and
reasonable attorney fees. Such remedies shall
be independent of and in addition to the other
penalties and remedies prescribed under this
section.
6. The prosecuting attorney or circuit
attorney with jurisdiction over the location
where a violation or threatened violation of
this section occurs or the attorney general of
this state shall investigate complaints of
violation or threatened violation of this
section, prosecute any person violating this
section, and use all means at their command to
ensure the effective enforcement of this section.
7. This section shall not apply:
(1) To employers and employees covered by
the federal Railway Labor Act;
(2) To federal employers and employees;
(3) To employers and employees on
exclusive federal enclaves;
(4) Where this section conflicts with or
is preempted by federal law; or
(5) To any agreement between an employer
and a labor organization entered into before
August 28, 2017, but shall apply to any such
agreement upon its renewal, extension,
amendment, or modification in any respect after
August 28, 2017.]
✓